Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. Offices and Terms

§ 15-11-101.
When offices filled.

The offices specified in this article shall be filled by the vote of the residents of a city or town at the general municipal election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-335; W.S. 1977, §

22-23-501

; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 4.

§ 15-11-102.
Officers of incorporated town; terms; how elected.

The elective officers of an incorporated town are one (1) mayor and four (4) councilmen. The term of office of mayor and councilman is four (4) years, and until his successor is qualified. They are elected at large.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-336; W.S. 1977, § 22-23-502; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 4; 2005, ch. 25, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

changed the term of the mayor from two to four years.

Laws 2005, ch. 25, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2005.

Prospective application. —

Laws 2005, ch. 25, § 2, provides that nothing in the act shall be deemed to extend the current term of office of any elected official serving on the effective date of the act.

§ 15-11-103.
Officers of first class city; terms; how elected.

The elective officers of a first class city, not including a city adopting the commission or city manager form of government, are a mayor and the number of councilmen determined by the governing body of the city when they provide for the number of wards in the city. The term of office of the mayor and a councilman is four (4) years and until his successor is qualified. The mayor shall be elected at large and the councilmen shall be elected at large or by wards or by a combination of at large and ward election districts. The governing body of the city shall determine by ordinance at the time wards are created or reorganized whether individual, multimember or at large election districts shall be provided. The districting system, as approved by the council to apply uniformly to the entire city, may provide individual member election districts, multimember election districts which do not exceed three (3) council members per district, or that a portion of the entire membership of the council not to exceed one-third (1/3) of the total members shall be elected from an at large district constituting the entire city. Once established, the districts, except to modify boundaries because of population changes and to encompass annexed territory, shall not be altered or amended more often than each ten (10) years or when the state reapportions.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-337; Laws 1983, ch. 183, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

22-23-503

; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 3.

§ 15-11-104.
Officers in city or town with commission government; term; how elected.

The elective officers of a city or town adopting the commission form of government are a mayor, a commissioner of finance and public property, and a commissioner of streets and public improvements. The term of the mayor is four (4) years and each commissioner is two (2) years and until his successor is qualified. They are elected at large.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-338; W.S. 1977, §

22-23-504

; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 4; 2005, ch. 25, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

changed the term of the mayor from two to four years.

Laws 2005, ch. 25, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2005.

Prospective application. —

Laws 2005, ch. 25, § 2, provides that nothing in the act shall be deemed to extend the current term of office of any elected official serving on the effective date of the act.

§ 15-11-105.
Officers in city or town with city manager government; terms; legislative authority; method of selection; alternative method.

The elective officers of a city or town adopting the city manager form of government are councilmen elected as provided by law. There shall be three (3) councilmen in cities and towns having a population of less than four thousand (4,000), seven (7) in those having a population of four thousand (4,000) or more but less than twenty thousand (20,000) and nine (9) in those having a population of twenty thousand (20,000) or more. The term of office of a councilman is four (4) years and until his successor is qualified. Legislative authority is vested in the council.

Councilmen in a municipality adopting the city manager form of government shall be elected at large, unless a petition requesting an alternate method of selection by wards, or by a combination of wards and at large, is approved at a special election on the question by a majority vote of the electors voting on the question:

Such petition shall be signed by not less than ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors registered in the municipality;

If the petition is for a combination of wards and at large, it shall state the number of wards, the number of councilmen to be elected from each ward, and the number of councilmen to be elected at large. A petition seeking ward representation or combination of wards and at large shall contain the names of petitioners to serve on the ward boundary committee;

The petition shall be filed with the city clerk, who shall determine whether the petition is legally sufficient;

If the petition is legally sufficient, the question shall be submitted to the voters at a special municipal election and shall be in the following form:

Shall the city councilmen be elected at large? Yes • No • Shall the city councilmen be elected by wards? Yes • No • Shall the city councilmen be elected by a combination of wards and at large as follows: (Here state the method of combination requested in the petition) Yes • No •

Click to view

The method approved by a plurality vote shall be proclaimed adopted by the mayor. A copy of the proclamation shall be mailed to the county clerk and the secretary of state;

If representation by wards or a combination of wards and at large is adopted, ward boundaries shall be determined by a committee composed of the governing body and an equal number of petitioners designated in the petition, and adopted by ordinance of the governing body. The creation or elimination of wards shall take effect at the next regular municipal primary and general elections;

If an alternate method of selecting councilmen is not adopted at the special election, the question shall not be submitted to the voters within four (4) years after the election. If an alternate method of representation is adopted at the special election, the question of changing the method of representation shall not be submitted to the voters for ten (10) years after the special election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-339; W.S. 1977, § 22-23-505; 1998, ch. 100, § 4; 2009, ch. 170, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), in the second sentence, deleted “according to the last preceding United States census” from the end.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “(a)
No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b)
No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Construction with other law. —

The plain language of subsection (b) authorizes petitions to include two alternative methods of selecting council members and is fully consistent with other Wyoming election code provisions. Shumway v. Worthey, 2001 WY 130, 37 P.3d 361,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2001).

Mayor without veto power. —

In all cities of the first class which choose to come under the manager form of government, the mayor is without the power of veto. State ex rel. Keefe v. McInerney, 63 Wyo. 280, 182 P.2d 28,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1947).

§ 15-11-106.
Term of office subject to termination.

The term of any municipal elective office is subject to termination if a change of the form of municipal government necessitates a termination of an existing term of office.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-340; W.S. 1977, § 22-23-506; 1998, ch. 100, § 4.